District of Columbia statutes.
9-924

Act liberally construed.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the District and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 25, 32 DCR 6093
1981 Ed., § 7-1274.